Arkansas, session 2025, SB262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-29-307, concerning the officers,
directors, and shareholders of a medical corporation, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, a person
who legally acquires ownership in a medical corporation while holding an
active license under the Arkansas Medical Practices Act, § 17-95-201 et seq.,
§ 17-95-301 et seq., and § 17-95-401 et seq., may retain ownership,
management, and control of the medical corporation after his or her license
becomes inactive or is voluntarily surrendered if:
(1) All medical services are provided only by individuals who
*JMB231*
04-07-2025 14:26:18 JMB231

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB262
are licensed; and
(2) His or her license was in good standing at the time the
license became inactive or was voluntarily surrendered and not subject to a
disciplinary action, suspension, or revocation.

/s/C. Penzo






























04-07-2025 14:26:18 JMB231